Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1222
Displacing agency, defined.

Displacing agency shall mean (1) any agency carrying out a publicly financed project which causes an individual to become a displaced person and (2) any person lacking the power of eminent domain who carries out a publicly financed project when that project causes an individual to be a displaced person.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 9.